Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 1 General Provisions
12-4-108. Withdrawal of retained funds — Contractors.

Any construction contractor may, from time to time, withdraw any part, or the whole, of the amount which has been retained from partial payments to the contractor pursuant to the terms of the contract upon the deposit of securities in the manner described in this section.

This section shall require delivery of securities to or in the name of the:

State treasurer for construction contracts entered into by the state, and any agency or department thereof, including the department of transportation, under § 54-5-113; or

Any other appropriate public official named in the contract for construction contracts entered into by the University of Tennessee or any county, municipality, or political subdivision of the state, including, but not limited to, metropolitan government.

The following shall be considered as securities and may be substituted for retained funds:

United States treasury bonds, United States treasury notes, United States treasury bills;

General obligation bonds of the state of Tennessee;

Certificates of deposit or evidence of other deposits irrevocably pledged from a state or national bank having its principal office in Tennessee or a state or federal savings and loan association having its principal office in Tennessee; or

A letter of credit from a state or national bank having its principal office in Tennessee. The terms and conditions of any letter of credit shall be subject to the approval of the public official described in subsection (b). All letters of credit shall be accompanied by an authorization of the contractor to deliver retained funds to the bank issuing the letter.

No retained amount shall be withdrawn which would represent an amount in excess of the market value of the securities at the time of deposit or of the par value of such securities, whichever is lower, or in excess of the maximum amount committed and stated in the letter of credit.

At the time of deposit of the securities, they shall be accompanied by a conditional assignment to the public official described in subsection (b), which will empower the public official to take custody of the security and to negotiate it at any time to the extent necessary to cause the contract to be fulfilled.

In the case of securities deposited with the state treasurer, such securities shall be negotiated by the state treasurer in the event that the state building commission or the commissioner of transportation, whichever is applicable, determines that such is desirable in order to effectuate the timely completion of the project.

So long as securities remain on deposit and the contractor is not in default, all interest and income paid shall go to the contractor, less any custodial care and servicing costs.

The securities which remain on deposit at the time of completion of the contract and satisfaction of any statutory obligations with respect thereto shall be returned to the contractor.

The public official described in subsection (b) shall have the power to enter into a trust agreement with any state or national bank or state or federal savings and loan association or savings bank located in Tennessee for the safekeeping, custodial care and servicing of securities to the extent necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section. The financial institution serving as trustee under such trust agreement shall hold the securities in trust for the purposes of this section and for the use and benefit of the persons entitled to them under the provisions hereof; provided, that the securities held in trust will not be commingled with any securities owned by the financial institution or any third party, but will at all times remain segregated and subject to identification as the particular securities deposited and held in trust for the purposes of this section.

Acts 1970, ch. 387, § 1; 1971, ch. 340, § 1; 1972, ch. 613, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 12-434; Acts 1980, ch. 741, § 11; 1981, ch. 371, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 118, § 1; 1986, ch. 618, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Law Reviews.

1985 Tennessee Survey: Selected Developments in Tennessee Law, 53 Tenn. L. Rev. 337 (1986).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

12-4-109. Preplanning of capital investment projects account.

There is hereby established an account to be known as the capital preplanning account, which shall be the funding source for the preplanning of all capital projects undertaken by the departments and agencies of the state. The account shall be reimbursed for the preplanning cost of a capital investment project from the appropriations allocated to that project. Any funds remaining in the account at the end of any fiscal year shall be carried over to the succeeding fiscal year and expended only for the purpose specified in this section.

Acts 1972, ch. 751, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 9-409,9-4-109; Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 77; T.C.A. §12-4-114.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former §12-4-114 was transferred to this section by Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 77, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-4-109 were transferred to §§12-3-102,12-3-303,12-3-305 and12-3-310.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred this section from former §12-4-114 without amendment, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Applicability of section to highway specific service signs, §54-5-1103.

Contract services subcommittee, §3-7-112.

Distributing and posting solicitations and responses electronically, §12-3-1004.

Prompt payment for property and services, title 12, ch. 4, part 7.

Law Reviews.

Bid Protests in Tennessee (Steven W. Feldman), 34 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1998).

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. former §12-4-109(a)(1)(A) requires that evaluation criteria must be included in the RFP, OAG 07-12, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 12 (2/12/07).

12-4-110. Energy-related services.

Contracts by counties, cities, metropolitan governments, towns, utility districts and other municipal and public corporations of this state for energy-related services that include both engineering services and equipment, and have as their purpose the reduction of energy costs in public facilities, shall be awarded on the same basis as contracts for professional services.

Acts 1988, ch. 611, § 1; 2013, ch. 403, § 78; T.C.A. §12-4-115.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former §12-4-115 was transferred to this section by Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 78, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-4-110 were transferred to §12-3-303.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred this section from former §12-4-115 without amendment, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Applicability of section to highway specific service signs, §54-5-1103.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §12-4-115 (transferred to T.C.A. §12-4-110) does not apply to contracts procured by a local education agency for the construction or renovation of public school buildings, regardless of the specific procurement process employed by the LEA for its construction projects. T.C.A. §49-2-203 controls how an LEA shall procure contracts to construct or renovate a public school. OAG 13-04, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 1 (1/10/13).

12-4-111. Standard prototype design for correctional facilities.

For purposes of this part, “state standard prototype,” means a design on which a state correctional facility is based so that the design can be used by the state to construct similar buildings at different sites at a future time. The state building commission may designate state standard prototypes from design documents which were originally prepared for the exclusive use of the state. The state architect shall place the appropriate designation on a document which is determined to be a state standard prototype.

Prior to the reuse of documents for a project in which the original architect or engineer is not also involved, the state shall remove and obliterate from all documents the identification of the original architect or engineer, including name, address, professional seal or stamp, and signature. The architect or engineer who is involved in a state standard prototypical reuse project shall affix such architect's or engineer's seal or stamp to such design, and shall be solely responsible for all documents on which such architect's or engineer's seal or stamp is placed, and shall hold the original architect or engineer harmless from suits by third parties.

The original architect or engineer shall not be liable for injury or damage resulting from reuse of plans, designs, details, specifications or construction documents of a state standard prototype by the state or third parties, if the original architect or engineer is not also involved in the reuse project. It is the intent of this section that the architect or engineer who seals or stamps a prototype is legally responsible only for that set of documents on which such architect's or engineer's seal or stamp is placed.

Acts 1988, ch. 800, § 2; 2013, ch. 403, § 79; T.C.A. §12-4-116.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former § 12-4-111 were transferred to §12-3-302.

Cross-References. Applicability of section to highway specific service signs, §54-5-1103.

12-4-112. State agency contract guidelines.

As used in this section, “governmental entity” means any county, municipality, metropolitan government, town, utility district, or other municipal or public corporation of this state.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or private act to the contrary, a governmental entity may enter into multi-year contracts for painting and other maintenance of water storage tanks and appurtenant facilities procured through a request for proposals process. The request for proposals process shall invite prospective proposers to participate and shall indicate the service requirements and the categories used for evaluating the proposals, together with the relative weight of each category. Such categories shall include such factors as qualifications, experience on similar projects, availability of workers, technical approach, minority participation, cost, and any additional factor or factors deemed relevant by the procuring governmental entity. Cost shall not be the sole criterion for evaluation. Proposers shall be given at least thirty (30) days from public advertisement of the request for proposals to consider the evaluation factors set forth in the solicitation documents before submitting proposals. The contract shall be awarded to the best proposer who meets the minimum required qualifications, using the evaluation criteria set forth in this subsection (b).

Any governmental entity may, at its option, require such multi-year contracts to be competitively bid.

Acts 2005, ch. 386, § 1; 2013, ch. 403, § 80; T.C.A. §12-4-123.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-4-112 were transferred to §12-3-305, and provisions similar to former § 12-4-123 were transferred to this section.

Attorney General Opinions. Tennessee education lottery corporation: contract amendments. OAG 10-73, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 79 (5/21/10).

12-4-113. Deadline for addenda and questions concerning bid documents.

If a statute, ordinance, resolution, rule or regulation mandates the use of competitive bidding of any kind or nature whatsoever, by any state agency, county or municipal corporation, then, notwithstanding such law, ordinance, resolution, rule or regulation, no addenda within less than forty-eight (48) hours of the bid opening date, excluding weekends and legal holidays designated in § 15-1-101, shall be permitted unless the bid deadline is extended for a reasonable time as determined by the purchasing agent, which shall not be less than forty-eight (48) hours excluding weekends and legal holidays designated in § 15-1-101, to allow for any necessary changes to the bid documents and to allow bidders to resubmit their bids accordingly.

Any questions concerning the bid documents must be received by the designer no less than ninety-six (96) hours before bid opening date.

This section shall not apply to the department of transportation contracts or any state or local agency contracts funded in whole or in part with state or federal highway funds.

Acts 2011, ch. 260, § 1; 2013, ch. 329, § 4, 5; 2013, ch. 403, § 81; T.C.A. §12-4-126.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former §12-4-126 was transferred to this section by Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 81, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-4-113 were transferred to §12-3-307, and provisions similar to former §12-4-126 were transferred to this section.

12-4-114. No conflict of interest allowed.

No public officer or employee who is involved in making or administering a contract on behalf of a public agency may derive a direct benefit from the contract except as provided in this section, or as otherwise allowed by law.

No public employee having official responsibility for a procurement transaction shall participate in that transaction on behalf of the public body when the employee knows that:

The employee is contemporaneously employed by a respondent to a solicitation or contractor involved in the procurement transaction;

The employee, the employee's spouse, or any member of the employee's immediate family holds a position with a respondent to a solicitation, a contractor involved in the procurement transaction, such as an officer, director, trustee, partner or the like, or is employed in a capacity involving personal and substantial participation in the procurement transaction, or owns or controls an interest of more than five percent (5%);

The employee, the employee's spouse, or any member of the employee's immediate family has a pecuniary interest arising from the procurement transaction; or

The employee, the employee's spouse, or any member of the employee's immediate family is negotiating, or has an arrangement concerning, prospective employment with a respondent to a solicitation or contractor involved in the procurement transaction.

A public officer or employee who will derive a direct benefit from a contract with the public agency the officer or employee serves, but who is not involved in making or administering the contract, shall not attempt to influence any other person who is involved in making or administering the contract.

No public officer or employee may solicit or receive any gift, reward, or promise of reward in exchange for recommending, influencing, or attempting to influence the award of a contract by the public agency the officer or employee serves.

As used in this section, “immediate family” means spouse, dependent children or stepchildren, or relatives related by blood or marriage.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former §12-4-114 was transferred to §12-4-109 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 77, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-4-115. “Organizational conflicts of interest” defined — Policies and procedures — Reporting.

As used in this section, “organizational conflicts of interest” may include any relationship or action between any party, including contractors and consultants, and the state or its agents making decisions to procure or contract that may:

Conflict with the state's best interest; or

Taint the procurement process or reputation of the state.

The central procurement office, state building commission and department of transportation shall establish policies and procedures to define and identify organizational conflicts of interest. The policies and procedures shall set forth methods, which may include avoidance, mitigation, or waiver, to deal with organizational conflicts of interest.

The policies and procedures shall provide that all determinations relating to specific organizational conflicts of interest be in writing. Such determinations shall periodically be reported to the speaker of the house of representatives, the speaker of the senate and to the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 2014, ch. 758, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former §12-4-115 was transferred to §12-4-110 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 78, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

12-4-116. Electronic bidding.

Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, local governments may satisfy any requirement for mailing by distributing invitations to bid, requests for proposals and other solicitations electronically. In addition, local governments may receive bids, proposals, and other offers electronically. In order to assure the fullest possible participation of small businesses and minority-owned businesses, local governments shall not require such small businesses and minority-owned businesses to receive or respond to invitations to bid, requests for proposals, or other solicitations electronically.

Acts 2014, ch. 645, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former §12-4-116 was transferred to §12-4-111 by Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 79, effective July 1, 2013.

12-4-117. Residency and income requirements for employees prohibited — Exception — Definitions.

Notwithstanding any state law to the contrary, neither the state, its political subdivisions, agencies, or instrumentalities thereof, or any local government shall require a company bidding or contracting to provide services on a public construction project to employ individuals who reside within the jurisdiction of the state or local government or who are within a specific income range, unless otherwise required by federal law.

For purposes of this section:

“Local government” means any municipality or county, including a county with a metropolitan form of government; and

“Public construction project” means any construction project wherein state or local government funds may be appropriated or expended for the purpose of erecting, remodeling, altering, repairing, demolishing, or making any addition to any building; or any construction project for the purpose of building, rebuilding, locating, relocating, or repairing any street, highway, or bridge.

Acts 2016, ch. 587, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former §12-4-117 (Acts 1991, ch. 262, § 1), concerning members of the local governing body employed as court reporters, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 85, § 1, effective March 29, 1993.

12-4-118. Energy performance or guaranteed energy savings contract pilot projects — Alternative procurement or contracting vehicles.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for purposes of developing and implementing up to five (5) energy performance or guaranteed energy savings contract pilot projects for state-owned buildings and facilities, state procurement agencies may enter into an energy performance or guaranteed energy savings contract using alternative procurement or contracting vehicles, including, but not limited to, existing in-state and out-of-state government contracts that have been competitively procured, that incorporate energy savings into the scope of work to be performed under the contract, and that expressly authorize other contracting entities to execute contracts or price agreements under the terms and conditions of the master contract on behalf of a department, institution, agency, or campus having control of, or responsibility for, the management or operation of buildings and facilities; provided, that the contract award meets the requirements of § 12-4-110 relative to energy-related service contracts for counties, cities, metropolitan governments, towns, utility districts, and other municipal and public corporations of the state. Such contracts are subject to approval by the state building commission.

All projects implemented under an energy performance or guaranteed energy savings contract under subsection (a) are deemed to be pilot projects and shall be limited to the following energy conservation measures:

Building envelope weatherization;

Building automation controls;

Lighting retrofits and controls;

Water conservation, HVAC, chiller plant, boiler plant, or other mechanical modifications; and

Submetering to measure performance of controls or systems.

For the duration of each individual contract, an annual measurement and verification audit utilizing generally accepted auditing standards, such as the International Performance Measurement and Verification Protocol, shall be conducted, and the related audit report will include, but not be limited to, energy savings achieved, energy savings targets met or exceeded, energy savings targets missed, and guarantees paid by the energy service company executing the contract. The annual measurement and verification audit shall be conducted by, and the related audit report shall be prepared by, a third-party at the expense of the energy service company executing the contract. Each audit report shall be submitted annually by the state department, institution, or agency participating in one (1) or more pilot projects to the department of environment and conservation's office of energy programs within thirty (30) days following the close of the fiscal year. The department of environment and conservation's office of energy programs shall submit the data to the governor, the commissioner of environment and conservation, state procurement agencies, the state building commission, the comptroller of the treasury, the speaker of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives no later than August 31 for each year in which each project is implemented and in effect.

Any energy performance or guaranteed energy savings contract executed in accordance with this section must reach substantial completion of energy conservation measures on or before December 31, 2020.

The commissioner of environment and conservation, in cooperation with the state procurement agencies participating in one (1) or more pilot projects under this section, shall submit a report summarizing the results of each pilot project implemented under this section to the governor, the comptroller of the treasury, the speaker of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives no later than June 30, 2022.

This section shall not limit the availability of appropriate state agencies to otherwise enter into energy performance or guaranteed energy savings contracts.

Acts 2018, ch. 902, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former §12-4-118 (Acts 1999, ch. 458, §§ 2, 4), concerning liability for improper date or time processing by computer hardware and software, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 559, § 1, effective April 24, 2006.